src/foma/krl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [ADJ] 
                  [SG] [PL] 
                  [NOM] [ACC] [GEN] [PRT] [ESS] [TRANS] [IN+ESS] [IN+ABL] [IN+ALL] [AT+ESS] [AT+ABL] [AT+ALL]
                  [PRT_SG] [PRT_PL]


! W - weak grade
! G - vocal stem

LEXICON Root

Noun;

LEXICON Noun

mieš    Ninf;
pelto   Ninf;
šuo     Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf

! nominative
[N][NOM][SG]:G #;   ! strong
[N][NOM][PL]:^tWG #; ! weak 

! accusative
[N][ACC][SG]:G    #;   ! strong
[N][ACC][PL]:^tWG #; ! weak 

!genitive
[N][GEN][SG]:^nWG   #; !weak
[N][GEN][PL]:i^en   #; !strong

!partitive
[N][PRT][SG]:[PRT_SG]   #;
[N][PRT][PL]:[PRT_PL]   #;
